Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-2115
Learning community funds; use; learning community coordinating council; powers and duties; pilot project; audits.

(1) Learning community funds distributed pursuant to section 79-2103 may be used by the learning community coordinating council receiving the funds for:

(a) The administration and operation of the learning community;

(b) The administration, operations, and programs of elementary learning centers pursuant to sections 79-2112 to 79-2114;

(c) Supplements for extended hours to teachers in elementary schools in which at least thirty-five percent of the students attending the school who reside in the attendance area of such school qualify for free or reduced-price lunches and elementary schools that provide free meals to all students pursuant to the community eligibility provision;

(d) Transportation to elementary school functions for parents of elementary students who qualify for free or reduced-price lunches or who attend an elementary school that provides free meals to all students pursuant to the community eligibility provision;

(e) Up to six social workers to provide services through the elementary learning centers; and

(f) Pilot projects authorized pursuant to section 79-2104.

(2) Each learning community coordinating council shall adopt policies and procedures for granting supplements for extended hours and for providing transportation for parents if any such funds are to be used for such purposes. An example of a pilot project that could receive such funds would be a school designated as Jump Start Center focused on providing intensive literacy services for elementary students with low reading scores.

(3) Each learning community coordinating council shall provide for financial audits of elementary learning centers and pilot projects. A learning community coordinating council shall serve as the recipient of private funds donated to support any elementary learning center or pilot project receiving funds from such learning community coordinating council and shall assure that the use of such private funds is included in the financial audits required pursuant to this section.

Laws 2007, LB641, § 47;

Laws 2008, LB1154, § 24;

Laws 2010, LB1070, § 18;

Laws 2015, LB525, § 29.